verbo/espanol_verbo_fut_simple.foma
define FutSimpleIndYo1 [a r ")"] -> {é} || _ 1;
define FutSimpleIndTu1 [a r ")"] -> {ás} || _ 2;
define FutSimpleIndElla1 [a r ")"] -> {á} || _ 3;
define FutSimpleIndNos1 [a r ")"] -> {emos} || _ 4;
define FutSimpleIndVos1 [a r ")"] -> {éis} || _ 5;
define FutSimpleIndUst1 [a r ")"] -> {án} || _ 6;

define FutSimpleIndYo2 [e r ")"] -> {é} || _ 1;
define FutSimpleIndTu2 [e r ")"] -> {ás} || _ 2;
define FutSimpleIndElla2 [e r ")"] -> {á} || _ 3;
define FutSimpleIndNos2 [e r ")"] -> {emos} || _ 4;
define FutSimpleIndVos2 [e r ")"] -> {éis} || _ 5;
define FutSimpleIndUst2 [e r ")"] -> {án} || _ 6;

define FutSimpleIndYo3 [i r ")"] -> {é} || _ 1;
define FutSimpleIndTu3 [i r ")"] -> {ás} || _ 2;
define FutSimpleIndElla3 [i r ")"] -> {á} || _ 3;
define FutSimpleIndNos3 [i r ")"] -> {emos} || _ 4;
define FutSimpleIndVos3 [i r ")"] -> {éis} || _ 5;
define FutSimpleIndUst3 [i r ")"] -> {án} || _ 6;

define FutSimpleInd1 FutSimpleIndYo1 .o. FutSimpleIndTu1 .o. FutSimpleIndElla1 .o. FutSimpleIndNos1 .o. FutSimpleIndVos1 .o. FutSimpleIndUst1;
define FutSimpleInd2 FutSimpleIndYo2 .o. FutSimpleIndTu2 .o. FutSimpleIndElla2 .o. FutSimpleIndNos2 .o. FutSimpleIndVos2 .o. FutSimpleIndUst2;
define FutSimpleInd3 FutSimpleIndYo3 .o. FutSimpleIndTu3 .o. FutSimpleIndElla3 .o. FutSimpleIndNos3 .o. FutSimpleIndVos3 .o. FutSimpleIndUst3;

define FutSimpleInd FutSimpleInd1 .o. FutSimpleInd2 .o. FutSimpleInd3;
